District of Columbia statutes.
2-215.04

Repealed

District of Columbia Local Business Opportunity Commission — Regulations; disclosure of interest in pending measure; meetings; quorum; voting; appointment of Chairperson; staff; records.

Repealed.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 5, 23 DCR 9532b
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-91, § 4, 27 DCR 3280
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-268, § 8, 46 DCR 969
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(b), 47 DCR 520
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2382(a), 52 DCR 7503
1981 Ed., § 1-1144.
1973 Ed., § 1-854.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 9 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-267, May 8, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2986).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 9 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-102, April 30, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2793).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 9 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-65, April 3, 1997, 44 DCR 2437), and see § 9 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-347, May 6, 1998, 45 DCR 2988).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 8 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-39, March 22, 1999, 46 DCR 3019).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2382(a), (c) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Section 2382(c) of D.C. Law 16-33 provided: “(c) An order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law repealed by this section shall remain in effect under the corresponding provision enacted by this subtitle subtitle N of title II, §§ 2301 to 2391, of D.C. Law 16-33 until repealed, amended, or superseded.”.